Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-1040
Certificate of nomination; certificate of election; issuance by Secretary of State; when; form.

The Secretary of State shall within forty days after the election prepare and deliver a certificate of nomination or certificate of election to each person who meets the constitutional and statutory requirements of office and whom the board of state canvassers or Legislature has declared to have received the highest vote for such office or position in the statewide primary or general election. The certificate shall be substantially as follows:

State of Nebraska. At an election held on the ..... day of ........, ........... was elected to (or nominated for) the office of ......... for the term of ........ years from the ....... (or when filling a vacancy, for the residue of the term ending on the .... day of ........ 20....). Given at ............ this .... day of ........ 20.... .

The certificate shall be signed by the Governor, under the seal of the state, and countersigned by the Secretary of State if the candidate filed with the Secretary of State and was elected to a state office, as a member of Congress, or from a district whose boundaries extend beyond the limits of a single county.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 334;

Laws 2004, LB 813, § 17.